Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1003
Legislative intent.

The Legislature declares its intent to implement the findings specified in section 38-1002 through the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act, to regulate the practices and professions of cosmetology, nail technology, esthetics, electrology, and body art and cosmetology, nail technology, esthetics, and body art education in all forms, to limit the practice and teaching of cosmetology, nail technology, esthetics, or body art to persons and institutions as stipulated in the act and to penalize persons violating the act. The Legislature directs that all interpretations of the act be made with full cognizance of the findings and intentions expressed in this section and section 38-1002.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 3;

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 3;

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 3;

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 3;

Laws 2004, LB 906, § 5;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 20;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-342;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 265.